apertium-pwn.pwn.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Paiwan

# Part of speech categories
# <n>       # Noun
# <v>       # Verb
# <adj>     # Adjective
# <num>     # Numeral
# <mc>      # case marker
# <numb>    # number
# <np>      # proper noun
# <pr>      # preposition
# <prn>     # pronoun
# <conj>    # conjunction

# <sent>    # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>    # Hyphen
# <cm>      # Comma
# <apos>    # Apostrophe
# <quot>    # Quotation mark
# <lquot>   # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>   # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>    # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>    # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>      # Plural
# <sg>      # Singular

# Proper noun tags
# <top>     # Toponym
# <ant>     # Anthronym
# <al>      # Other

# Voice tags
# <actv>      # active voice
# <nactv>      # non-active voice
# <gv>      # goal voice
# <iv>      # instrument voice
# <lv>      # locative voice

# Gender tags
# <m>       # Masculine
# <f>       # Feminine

# Case Tags
# <nom>     # nominative
# <obl>     # oblique
# <gen>     # genitive

# Verb Tags
# <perf>    # Perfective
# <imp>     # imperative
# <caus>    # causative

# <loc>     # Locative
# <stv>     # stative
# <temp>    # temporal

# Pronoun Tags
# <pers>    # personal
# <p1>      # 1st person
# <p2>      # 2nd person
# <p3>      # 3rd person
# <incl>    # inclusive
# <excl>    # exclusive

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
# NounRoot RegNounInfl
Number
Punctuation
Linker
VerbBeHave
Noun
CaseMarker
Number
ProperNoun
Pronoun
Preposition
Conjunction
Adverb

PATTERN CaseMarker
MarkerCase(1) CaseMarkerRoot(1) [<mc>:] CaseMarkerRoot(2) MarkerCase(2)

PATTERN Conjunction
ConjuntionPrefix CaseMarker [<conj>:]

PATTERN Pronoun
PronounCase(1) PronounRoot(1) [<prn>:] PronounRoot(2) PronounCase(2)

PATTERN Adverb
LocativeAffix?(1) AdverbRoot [<adv>:] LocativeAffix?(2)

PATTERN Verb
GenCliticPronoun?(1) VerbPrefix?(1) VerbRoot [<v>:] VerbPrefix?(2) GenCliticPronoun?(2) VerbSuffix? NomCliticPronoun?

PATTERN Linker
Link [<lnk>:]

PATTERN Noun
NounRoot [<n>:]

PATTERN ProperNoun
ProperNounRoot(1) [<np>:] ProperNounRoot(2)

PATTERN VerbBeHave
BeHaveRoot [<vbser>:]

PATTERN Number
NumberRoot [<numb>:]

PATTERN Preposition
PrepositionRoot [<pr>:]

## Example inflection lexicon:
# LEXICON RegNounInfl
# <n><sg>:
# <n><pl>:>s


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################
